Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 34.1 Rhode Island Food Donation Act

21-34.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited as “The Rhode Island Food Donation Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 97, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 123, § 2.

21-34.1-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Director” means the director of the department of health.

“Enforcement officers” means authorized agents of the director responsible for inspecting food, food establishments, dairies, or foodborne disease outbreaks.

“Food bank” means a surplus food collection and distribution system operated and established to assist in bringing donated food to nonprofit charitable organizations and individuals for the purposes of reducing hunger and supplying nutritional needs.

“Food facility” means a food establishment that sells food for human consumption to the general public and shall include nonprofit food distributors, hospitals, and school and educational facilities.

“Gleaner” means a person who harvests for free distribution to the needy, or for donation to a nonprofit organization for ultimate distribution to the needy, an agricultural crop that has been donated by the owner.

“Person” means an individual.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 97, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 123, § 2.

21-34.1-3.
Immunity from liability for food donors.

A person, gleaner, or food facility may donate food to a food bank or to any other nonprofit charitable organization for distribution to persons free of charge. Food facilities may donate food directly to end recipients for consumption.

Except for injury resulting from gross negligence or intentional misconduct in the preparation or handling of donated food, no person, gleaner, or food facility who or that donates food that is fit for human consumption at the time it was donated to a nonprofit charitable organization or food bank shall be liable for any damage or injury resulting from the consumption of the donated food. Food facilities may donate food directly to end recipients for consumption.

The immunity from civil liability provided by this chapter applies regardless of compliance with any laws, regulations, or ordinances regulating the packaging or labeling of food storage or handling of the food by the donee after the donation of the food. The donation of nonperishable food that is fit for human consumption but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date recommended by the manufacturer is protected under the Rhode Island food donation act. The donation of perishable food that is fit for human consumption but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date recommended by the manufacturer is protected under the Rhode Island food donation act if the person who or that distributes the food to the end recipient makes a good-faith evaluation that the food to be donated is wholesome.

A nonprofit charitable organization or a food bank that, in good faith, receives and distributes food without charge that is fit for human consumption at the time it was distributed is not liable for an injury or death due to the food unless the injury or death is a direct result of the gross negligence or intentional misconduct of the organization.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the ability of a person, gleaner, or food facility to donate food.

A person or gleaner engaged in the business of processing, distributing, or selling an agricultural product may donate, free of charge, a product that is in a condition that it may be used as food for human consumption to a nonprofit charitable organization within the state. Food facilities may donate food directly to end recipients for consumption. The donation of nonperishable food that is fit for human consumption but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date recommended by the manufacturer is protected under the Rhode Island food donation act. The donation of perishable food that is fit for human consumption but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date recommended by the manufacturer is protected under the Rhode Island food donation act if the person who or that distributes the food to the end recipient makes a good-faith evaluation that the food to be donated is wholesome.

To assist in accomplishing the purposes of this chapter, the director may redistribute donated agricultural products to organizations operating pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 97, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 123, § 2.

21-34.1-4.
Expiration dates.

A person, gleaner, or food facility who or that donates food as permitted by law shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability or penalty for violation of any laws, regulations, or ordinances regulating the labeling or packaging of the donated product or, with respect to any other laws, regulations, or ordinances, for a violation occurring after the time of the donation. The donation of nonperishable food that is fit for human consumption but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date recommended by the manufacturer is protected under the Rhode Island food donation act. The donation of perishable food that is fit for human consumption but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date recommended by the manufacturer is protected under the Rhode Island food donation act if the person that distributes the food to the end recipient makes a good-faith evaluation that the food to be donated is wholesome.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 97, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 123, § 2.

21-34.1-5.
Public education.

In implementing this chapter, enforcement officers shall promote the recovery of food fit for human consumption during their normal, routine inspections. Promotion shall include, but not be limited to, newsletters, bulletins, and handouts that inform retail food facility operators about the protections from civil and criminal liability when donating food.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 97, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 123, § 2.

21-34.1-6.
Implementing rules and regulations.

The director shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 97, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 123, § 2.